Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.655.185

Intent—Apple award program.

(1) It is the intent of the legislature, through the creation of the apple award, to honor and reward students in Washington's public elementary schools who have shown significant improvement in their school's results on the statewide student assessment.

(2) The apple award program is created to honor and reward public elementary schools that have the greatest combined average increase in the percentage of students meeting the fourth grade reading, mathematics, and writing standards on the statewide student assessment each school year. Beginning in the 2014-15 school year, the award shall be based on the percentage of students meeting the fourth grade English language arts and mathematics standards. The program shall be administered by the superintendent of public instruction.

(3) Within the amounts appropriated for this purpose, each school that receives an apple award shall be provided with a twenty-five thousand dollar grant to be used for capital construction purposes that have been selected by students in the school and approved by the district's school directors. The funds may be used exclusively for capital construction projects on school property or on other public property in the community, city, or county in which the school is located.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 22 s 9; 2005 c 495 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2013 2nd sp.s. c 22: See note following RCW 28A.655.068.